Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.091, is amended to read: 168.091 deleted text begin 31-DAYdeleted text end new text begin 60-DAYnew text end TEMPORARY VEHICLE PERMIT. Subdivision 1. Nonresident buyer. (a) Upon payment of a fee of $1, the commissioner may issue a permit to a nonresident purchasing a vehicle in this state for the sole purpose of allowing the vehicle to be removed from this state. (b) The permit is in lieu of any other registration or taxation for use of the highways and is valid for a period of deleted text begin 31deleted text end new text begin 60new text end days from the date of sale, trade, or gift. (c) The permit must be available in an electronic format as determined by the commissioner. (d) If the sale, gift, or trade information is electronically transmitted to the commissioner by a dealer or deputy registrar of motor vehicles, the $1 fee is waived. (e) The permit must be affixed to the rear of the vehicle where it is plainly visible. Each permit is valid only for the vehicle for which the permit was issued. Subd. 2. Dealer. The registrar may issue permits to licensed dealers upon payment of the proper fee for each permit. Subd. 3. Proceeds to highway user fund. All payments received for such permits shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the highway user tax distribution fund. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2025, for permits issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements upon subsequent transfer; service fee. (a) A dealer who buys a vehicle and holds it for resale need not apply for a certificate of title. Upon transferring the vehicle to another person, other than by the creation of a security interest, the dealer must promptly execute the assignment and warranty of title by a dealer, showing the names and addresses of the transferee and of any secured party holding a security interest created or reserved at the time of the resale, and the date of the security agreement in the spaces provided on the certificate of title or secure reassignment. (b) If a dealer elects to apply for a certificate of title on a vehicle held for resale, the dealer need not register the vehicle but must pay one month's registration tax. If a dealer elects to apply for a certificate of title on a vehicle held for resale, the commissioner must not place any legend on the title that no motor vehicle sales tax was paid by the dealer but may indicate on the title whether the vehicle is a new or used vehicle. (c) With respect to motor vehicles subject to the provisions of section 325E.15, the dealer must also, in the space provided on the certificate of title or secure reassignment, state the true cumulative mileage registered on the odometer or that the exact mileage is unknown if the odometer reading is known by the transferor to be different from the true mileage. (d) The transferee must complete the application for title section on the certificate of title or separate title application form prescribed by the commissioner. The dealer must mail or deliver the certificate to the commissioner or deputy registrar with the transferee's application for a new certificate and appropriate taxes and fees, within the period specified under section 168A.10, subdivision 2. (e) With respect to vehicles sold to buyers who will remove the vehicle from this state, the dealer must remove any license plates from the vehicle, issue a deleted text begin 31-daydeleted text end new text begin 60-daynew text end temporary permit pursuant to section 168.091, and notify the commissioner within 48 hours of the sale that the vehicle has been removed from this state. The notification must be made in an electronic format prescribed by the commissioner. The dealer may contract with a deputy registrar for the notification of sale to an out-of-state buyer. The deputy registrar may charge a fee of $7 per transaction to provide this service. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2025, for permits issued on or after that date. new text end